Hawaii, session 2026, HB1880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 149A-31, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§149A-31  Prohibited acts.  No person shall: (1)  Use any pesticide in a manner inconsistent with its label, except that it shall not be unlawful to: (A)  Apply a pesticide at any dosage, concentration, or frequency less than that specified on the label or labeling; provided that the efficacy of the pesticide is maintained; provided further that when a pesticide is applied by a commercial applicator, the deviation from the label recommendations shall be with the consent of the purchaser of the pesticide application services; (B)  Apply a pesticide against any target pest not specified in the labeling if the application is to a crop, animal, or site specified on the label or labeling; provided that the label or labeling does not specifically prohibit the use on pests other than those listed on the label or labeling; (C)  Employ any method of application not prohibited by the labeling; (D)  Mix a pesticide or pesticides with a fertilizer when the mixture is not prohibited by the label or labeling; or (E)  Use in a manner determined by rule not to be an unlawful act; (2)  Use, store, transport, or discard any pesticide or pesticide container in any manner that would have unreasonable adverse effects on the environment; (3)  Use or apply restricted use pesticides unless the person is a certified pesticide applicator or under the direct supervision of a certified pesticide applicator with a valid certificate issued pursuant to rules adopted under section 149A-33(1); provided that it shall be prohibited to use or apply a restricted use pesticide for structural pest control uses for a fee or trading of services, unless the user or applicator is a pest control operator or is employed by a pest control operator licensed under chapter 460J; (4)  Use or apply pesticides in any manner that has been suspended, canceled, or restricted pursuant to section 149A-32.5; (5)  Falsify any record or report required to be made or maintained by rules adopted pursuant to this chapter; (6)  Fill with water, through a hose, pipe, or other similar transmission system, any tank, implement, apparatus, or equipment used to disperse pesticides, unless the tank, implement, apparatus, equipment, hose, pipe, or other similar transmission system is equipped with an air gap or a reduced-pressure principle backflow device meeting the requirements under section 340E-2 and the rules adopted thereunder; [or] (7)  Beginning January 1, 2019, use or apply any pesticide containing chlorpyrifos as an active ingredient; provided that: (A)  The department shall grant to any person, upon request, a temporary permit authorizing the person, until December 31, 2022, to use or apply a pesticide containing chlorpyrifos as an active ingredient; and (B)  Any person who violates this paragraph shall be subject to a penalty pursuant to section 149A-41[.]; or (8)  Beginning January 1, 2030, use or apply any pesticide containing 1,3-dichloropropene as an active ingredient." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3001.